Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 186.400 TO 186.640 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The circuit clerk of each county shall:
(1) Act for the cabinet for the purpose of accepting applications for and issuing
temporary operator's licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification
cards;
(2) Comply with all administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet;
(3) Administer the oath required under Sections 7 and 8 of this Act to applicants,
without fee;
(4) Electronically transmit a copy of all applications and supporting documents
taken by the office to the cabinet no later than the next business day;
(5) Report and remit to the cabinet, no later than the third business day of the month,
all moneys collected by the office during the preceding month. Upon failure of
any circuit clerk to report and remit therefor more than seven (7) days after the
due date, the clerk shall pay, in addition to the amount due, a penalty of ten
percent (10%) of the amount due. Penalties collected under this section shall be
paid into the State Treasury as a part of the revenue collected under Section 18 of
this Act; and
(6) Keep adequate records of all moneys collected and remitted to the cabinet.
Section 2. KRS 186.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The administration of the provisions of KRS 186.400 to 186.640 not specifically
vested in the Transportation Cabinet or the circuits clerks shall be vested in the
Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate
administrative[prescribe] regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the
enforcement of KRS 186.400 to 186.640. The Transportation Cabinet also shall
Page 1 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
enforce regulations governing the acts of motor vehicle operators under KRS
186.400 to 186.640 and require reports which it deems necessary.
(2) The cabinet shall provide or cause to be provided to appropriate persons or officials
an adequate supply of forms for the administration of KRS 186.400 to 186.640. The
style of those forms and the method of their use shall be prescribed by the cabinet
and shall be adequate to protect the safety interests of the state. The Transportation
Cabinet shall prescribe the method of financial control.
(3) (a) The Transportation Cabinet shall collect all moneys due the state under KRS
186.531 from the circuit clerks for operators' licenses and personal
identification cards issued, and shall deposit those moneys with the state
treasurer.
(b) At least once each year the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall cause
a reconciliation to be made between the record of monetary receipts by each
circuit clerk[the Transportation Cabinet] and the number[receipt] of
applications accepted by each circuit clerk[the Transportation Cabinet].
Section 3. KRS 186.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, every person not exempted by
KRS 186.420 and 186.430 shall, before operating a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or
moped upon a highway, secure an operator's license as provided in this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 186.4121, all original, renewal, and duplicate personal
identification cards and licenses for the operation of motor vehicles or motorcycles
shall be applied for with the circuit clerk in the county of the applicant's
residence[Transportation Cabinet], or through alternative technology, and issued by
the Transportation Cabinet. Subject to the provisions of KRS 186.4101,
applications for renewal licenses and personal identification cards shall be made
every eight (8) years within the birth month of the applicant. A license shall not be
issued until the application has been certified by the cabinet and the applicant has, if
Page 2 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
required under KRS 186.635, successfully completed the examinations required
under KRS 186.480.
(3) All personal identification cards shall be issued under the provisions of KRS
186.4102, 186.4122, and 186.4123.
(4) A person under the age of eighteen (18) years who applies for an instruction permit
shall, at any time between the age of fifteen (15) years and before the person's
eighteenth birthday, enroll in one (1) of the following driver training programs:
(a) A driver's education course administered by a school district;
(b) A driver training school licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 332 which offers a
course meeting or exceeding the minimum standards established by the
Transportation Cabinet; or
(c) State traffic school. The person may seek to enroll in state traffic school
before the person's eighteenth birthday. Persons enrolling in state traffic
school pursuant to this paragraph shall not be required to pay a fee.
(5) Any applicant for any initial or renewal instruction permit, operator's license, or
personal identification card under KRS 186.400 to 186.640 may apply for either:
(a) A voluntary travel ID document; or
(b) A standard document that does not meet standards for federal identification
purposes.
(6) When an automated driving system as defined in KRS 186.760 is installed on a
motor vehicle and is engaged, and the motor vehicle is operating as a fully
autonomous vehicle as defined in KRS 186.760, the:
(a) Owner of the motor vehicle is considered the operator of the fully autonomous
vehicle and shall comply with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws,
regardless of whether the owner is physically present in the vehicle while the
vehicle is operating; and
(b) Automated driving system is considered to be licensed to operate the vehicle
Page 3 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
and a licensed human operator is not required to operate the motor vehicle.
Section 4. KRS 186.4101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a license to operate a motor
vehicle, motorcycle, or moped, or a personal identification card shall be renewed
every eight (8) years prior to its expiration. Except as provided in KRS 186.410, a
person seeking to renew an operator's license shall apply to the office of the circuit
clerk in the county where the person resides[cabinet] in accordance with KRS
186.412 and 186.4121.
(2) An applicant for a renewal license, instruction permit, or identification card may
choose to be issued a document that is valid for four (4) years. Fees for documents
issued for a four (4) year period shall be adjusted in accordance with KRS 186.531.
(3) The fee to renew an operator's license or personal identification card shall be
according to the schedule set forth in KRS 186.531.
Section 5. KRS 186.4102 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet
shall issue operator's licenses and personal identification cards bearing a
photograph of the applicant and other information the cabinet may deem
appropriate to qualified applicants under this chapter. When taking the photograph,
the applicant shall be prohibited from wearing sunglasses, veils, scarves, or any
other attire that obscures or creates shadows upon any features of the applicant's
face as determined by the circuit clerk[cabinet]. An applicant shall be required to
remove eyewear that obstructs the iris or the pupil of the eyes and shall not take any
action to obstruct a photograph of his or her facial features. The face shall be visible
from the crown to the base of the chin and from ear to ear. Any person who refuses
to remove attire prohibited by this subsection as directed by the person taking the
application shall be prohibited from receiving an operator's license or personal
identification card.
Page 4 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(2) An operator's license or personal identification card issued by the cabinet shall not
contain the applicant's Social Security number. The cabinet shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that develop a
numbering system that uses an identification system other than Social Security
numbers. If an applicant submits adequate proof that he or she does not have a
Social Security number, the Transportation Cabinet shall assign the applicant a
unique identifying number.
(3) The license or personal identification card shall also designate by color coding and
using the phrase "under 21" if the licensee or card holder is under the age of twenty-
one (21); "CDL" if the license is issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 281A; or "under
21 CDL" if the licensee holds a commercial driver's license issued pursuant to KRS
Chapter 281A and is under the age of twenty-one (21).
(4) The cabinet shall provide on each operator's license and personal identification card
space for a notation that the holder of the license or personal identification card has
expressed to the circuit clerk[cabinet] the person's willingness to make an
anatomical gift under KRS 311.1917. If a person who has made a declaration under
this subsection wishes to rescind that declaration, the person shall notify the
Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks' Trust for Life, which shall remove the notation from
his or her records.
(5) An operator's license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be designated a Class D
license.
(6) A person shall not have more than one (1) operator's license.
(7) Upon marriage, dissolution of marriage, or any other qualifying event, if a person
seeks to change his or her name, the person shall make a name change with the
Social Security Administration prior to applying for an operator's license or a
personal identification card and shall provide the circuit clerk[cabinet] with the
person's marriage license, divorce decree, or other documentation. The name issued
Page 5 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
on the identity document shall match the person's first and last name as recorded
with the Social Security Administration. Unless a person is eligible to renew his or
her identity document at the time of the name change, the fee charged under this
section shall be for a corrected identity document as set forth in KRS 186.531.
(8) An identity document issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation that
either:
(a) The identity document is a voluntary travel ID identity document that
complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II,
and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or
(b) The identity document shall not be used for federal identification purposes.
(9) (a) The Transportation Cabinet may provide for the issuance of an instruction
permit, operator's license, or personal identification card without a photograph
if there is good cause for the omission based in documented religious
objections. The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative
regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish the criteria and
requirements for obtaining an operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card without a photograph.
(b) An applicant for an initial instruction permit, operator's license, or personal
identification card without a photograph shall apply to the Transportation
Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office. The application
shall be processed solely by the Transportation Cabinet in the same manner as
in KRS 186.4121(5) and 186.4123(8).
(c) An operator's license, instruction permit, or personal identification card issued
without a photograph shall denote on its face that it shall not be accepted by
any federal agency for identification or any other federal purpose.
Section 6. KRS 186.411 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If a person with a seizure condition applies for an original, duplicate,
Page 6 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
modified, or renewal operator's license, or applies for an instruction permit, he
or she shall be required by the cabinet to present to the Division of Driver
Licensing:
1. Certification by a physician or advanced practice registered nurse:
a. Stating that his or her condition is controlled by drugs;[,]
b. Details of the drugs, including dosages, which the person takes;[,]
and
c. That the person has been free of any seizures for ninety (90) days;
and
2, His or her own statement that he or she:
a. Has been free of any seizures for ninety (90) days before the date
of the application;[,] and
b. [ that he or she ]Is taking the medication prescribed by his or her
physician or advanced practice registered nurse.
(b) The division shall upon receipt of the required documentation issue the
person[him] a letter of authorization to present to the circuit clerk[cabinet].
The circuit clerk[cabinet] shall not issue an operator's license to a person with
a seizure condition who does not present the letter of authorization.
(2) Any person who has a seizure condition who cannot present the certification that
his or her condition is controlled by drugs or a statement that he or she has been
seizure-free for ninety (90) days shall be notified in writing by the cabinet that the
person's privilege to operate a motor vehicle is withdrawn and of his or her right to
have an informal hearing on the matter of whether he or she is an unsafe driver as a
result of having the seizure condition. The notice shall be mailed by first-class mail
to the address of record of the person. The hearing shall be automatically waived if
not requested within twenty (20) days after the cabinet mails notice. The hearing
shall be scheduled as early as practical after receipt of the request at a time and
Page 7 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
place designated by the cabinet.
(3) A person whose seizure condition would impair his or her ability to operate a motor
vehicle may present evidence of the condition to the Division of Driver Licensing's
medical review board as established under KRS 186.444, including his or her own
attested statement, physician's or advanced practice registered nurse's statement,
and medical dosage details. If the board determines that the person's seizure
condition would not impair his or her ability to operate a motor vehicle, the division
shall issue the letter of authorization required by subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A person whose seizure condition is of a nature that the seizure condition would not
impair the ability to operate a motor vehicle may present evidence of this fact to the
Division of Driver Licensing, including the person's own attested statement,
physician's or advanced practice registered nurse's statement, and medicine dosage
details. If the division determines that the person's seizure condition does not impair
the ability to operate a motor vehicle, the division shall issue the letter of
authorization required by subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Any physician or advanced practice registered nurse shall not be subject to civil or
criminal liability, absent a showing of bad faith, for providing any reports, records,
examinations, opinions, or recommendations pursuant to this section.
Section 7. KRS 186.412 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; or
(b) Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of the
REAL ID ACT of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and has
been admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact
of free association between the United States and the Republic of the Marshall
Islands, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of Micronesia.
(2) An applicant shall apply for an instruction permit or operator's license with the
Page 8 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
circuit clerk in the county where the applicant resides[Transportation Cabinet], or
through alternative technology. Except as provided in KRS 186.417, the application
form shall require the applicant's:
(a) Full legal name and signature;
(b) Date of birth;
(c) Social Security number or a letter from the Social Security Administration
declining to issue a Social Security number;
(d) Sex;
(e) Present Kentucky resident address, exclusive of a post office box address
alone;
(f) Other information necessary to permit the application of United States citizens
to also serve as an application for voter registration;
(g) A brief physical description of the applicant;
(h) Proof of the applicant's Kentucky residency, including but not limited to a
deed or property tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing
agreement; and
(i) Other information the cabinet may require by administrative regulation
promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) (a) To satisfy the requirements of subsection (2)(e) and (h) of this section, an
applicant seeking to obtain a renewal or duplicate operator's license may use a
completed form attesting to the lack of an established and fixed nighttime
residence of regular return as established in accordance with paragraph (b) of
this subsection. The form developed under paragraph (b) of this subsection
shall not be used by an applicant for an initial operator's license or instruction
permit.
(b) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to develop forms and procedures whereby an applicant for
Page 9 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
a renewal or duplicate operator's license under this section or KRS 186.4121,
or an applicant for an initial, renewal, or duplicate personal identification card
under KRS 186.4122 or 186.4123, who does not have an established and fixed
nighttime residence of regular return may use as proof of residency, a form,
attested to by a homeless shelter, health care facility, or social service agency
currently providing the applicant treatment or services, that the applicant is a
resident of Kentucky. An applicant who does not have an established and
fixed nighttime residence of regular return shall not be issued a voluntary
travel ID operator's license under this section or KRS 186.4121.
(4) In addition to the information identified in subsection (2) of this section, a:
(a) Permanent resident shall present one (1) of the following documents issued by
the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of
Citizenship and Immigration Services:
1. An I-551 card with a photograph of the applicant; or
2. A form with the photograph of the applicant or a passport with a
photograph of the applicant on which the United States Department of
Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and
Immigration Services, has stamped the following: "Processed for I-551.
Temporary evidence of lawful admission for permanent residence. Valid
until .... (Expiration Date). Employment authorized."; and
(b) Person who meets the definition in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall
present a valid, unexpired passport from his or her country of origin, along
with one (1) of the following documents issued by the United States
Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and
Immigration Services:
1. Form I-94, Arrival/Departure Record number;
2. Form I-766, Employment Authorization Document number; or
Page 10 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
3. Form I-797, Notice of Action receipt number.
(5) Upon application for an operator's license under this section, the circuit
clerk[cabinet] shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with the
requirements of KRS 186.4102(1).
(6) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the circuit
clerk[cabinet] shall electronically scan the documents required for application
under this section and shall electronically forward[retain] the application,
supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant to the cabinet.
Upon completion of any required examinations under KRS 186.480, the
circuit clerk[cabinet] shall present the applicant with a temporary operator's
license or instruction permit, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a
permanent operator's license or instruction permit is mailed to the applicant by
the Transportation Cabinet.
(b) The circuit clerk[cabinet] shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of
an individual applying for a voluntary travel ID instruction permit or
operator's license. If the applicant is not seeking such a permit or license, the
circuit clerk[cabinet] shall not electronically scan the applicant's birth
certificate.
(c) An applicant for an operator's license or instruction permit shall not be
required to surrender the applicant's birth certificate for image capture, image
storage, or image transmission to any entity, including the federal
government, unless express consent is given by the applicant during the
course of obtaining a voluntary travel ID license or permit.
(7) An applicant shall swear an oath to the circuit clerk[cabinet] as to the truthfulness
of the statements contained in the form.
Section 8. KRS 186.4122 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
Page 11 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(a) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; or
(b) Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of the
REAL ID ACT of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and has
been admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact
of free association between the United States and the Republic of the Marshall
Islands, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of Micronesia.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue a personal identification card to an applicant
who:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident;
(b) Applies in person to the office of the circuit clerk of the county in which the
applicant resides,[cabinet] or through alternative technology; and
(c) Complies with the provisions of this section.
(3) Upon application for a personal identification card under this section, the circuit
clerk[cabinet] shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS
186.4102(1).
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the circuit
clerk[cabinet] shall electronically scan the documents required for application
under this section and shall electronically forward[retain] the application,
supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant to the cabinet. The
circuit clerk[cabinet] shall present the applicant with a temporary personal
identification card, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent
personal identification card is mailed to the applicant by the Transportation
Cabinet.
(b) The circuit clerk[cabinet] shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of
an individual applying for a voluntary travel ID personal identification card. If
the applicant is not seeking such a document, the circuit clerk[cabinet] shall
not electronically scan the applicant's birth certificate.
Page 12 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(c) An applicant for a personal identification card shall not be required to
surrender the applicant's birth certificate for image capture, image storage, or
image transmission to any entity, including the federal government, unless
express consent is given by the applicant during the course of obtaining a
voluntary travel ID personal identification card.
(5) (a) An application for a personal identification card shall be accompanied by the
same information as is required for an operator's license under KRS 186.412,
except if an applicant does not have an established and fixed nighttime
residence of regular return, the applicant may:
1. Until July 1, 2025, use as proof of residency a signed letter from a
homeless shelter, health care facility, or social service agency currently
providing the applicant treatment or services and attesting that the
applicant is a resident of Kentucky; or
2. On or after July 1, 2025, follow the procedures outlined in KRS
186.412(3).
(b) An applicant who does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence
of regular return shall not be issued a voluntary travel ID personal
identification card.
(c) An applicant for a personal identification card who is at least sixteen (16)
years of age but less than eighteen (18) years of age shall not be required to
obtain a signature of a parent or legal guardian on the application if the
applicant has been verified as a homeless child or youth, as defined in 42
U.S.C. sec. 11434a(2), by at least one (1) of the following:
1. A director or designee of a governmental or nonprofit agency that
receives public or private funding to provide services to homeless
people;
2. A local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths
Page 13 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
designated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii), or a school
social worker or school counselor;
3. The director or director's designee of a federal TRIO Program or a
Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Program; or
4. A financial aid administrator for an institution of higher education.
(d) It shall be permissible for the application form for a personal identification
card to include as an applicant's most current resident address a mailing
address or an address provided on a voter registration card.
(e) If the applicant is not the legal owner or possessor of the address provided on
the application form, the applicant shall swear that he or she has permission
from the legal owner, authorized agent for the legal owner, or possessor to use
the address for purposes of obtaining the personal identification card.
(6) (a) Every applicant for a personal identification card under this section shall
swear an oath to the circuit clerk[cabinet] as to the truthfulness of the
statements contained on the application form.
(b) A personal identification card may be suspended or revoked if the person who
was issued the card presents false or misleading information to the cabinet
when applying for the card.
(7) A personal identification card issued under this section shall be valid for a period of
eight (8) years from the date of issuance, except that if the personal identification
card is issued to a person who does not have an established and fixed nighttime
residence of regular return, then the personal identification card shall be valid for
one (1) year from the date of issuance.
(8) (a) An applicant shall not be issued a personal identification card if the applicant
currently holds a valid Kentucky instruction permit or operator's license. A
person shall not hold more than one (1) license or personal identification card.
(b) If a person's instruction permit or operator's license has been suspended or
Page 14 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
revoked, the person may be issued a personal identification card. A personal
identification card shall be surrendered when the person applies to have his or
her instruction permit or operator's license reinstated.
Section 9. KRS 186.416 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a resident of the Commonwealth currently serving in the United States military is
stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the boundaries of the
Commonwealth, the resident, or the resident's spouse or dependents, may:
(a) Update his or her license electronically or by mail to include a motorcycle
operator's endorsement on an existing operator's license; or
(b) Renew a Class D operator's license issued under this section by mail. If the
resident, or his or her spouse or dependents, was issued an "under 21"
operator's license, upon the date of the license holder's twenty-first birthday,
the "under 21" operator's license may be renewed for an operator's license that
no longer contains the outdated reference to being "under 21."
(2) A resident of the Commonwealth renewing an operator's license by mail under
subsection (1) of this section may have a personal designee apply to the circuit
clerk[cabinet] on behalf of the resident to renew the resident's operator's license. An
operator's license for which an endorsement is being added electronically or by
mail, or which is being renewed by mail under subsection (1) of this section shall be
issued a license bearing the applicant's historical photo if there is a photo on file. If
there is no photo on file, the license shall be issued without a photograph and shall
show in the space provided for the photograph the legend "valid without photo and
signature."
(3) (a) 1. If a resident of the Commonwealth has been serving in the United States
military stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the
boundaries of the Commonwealth and has allowed his or her operator's
license to expire, he or she shall, within ninety (90) days of returning to
Page 15 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
the Commonwealth, be permitted to renew his or her license without
having to take a written test or road test.
2. The spouse or dependent of a person identified in subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph shall be afforded the same consideration identified in that
subparagraph regarding the renewal of an expired operator's license.
(b) A person who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not
be convicted or cited for driving on an expired license prior to license renewal
during the ninety (90) days after the person's return to the Commonwealth if
the person can provide proof of his or her out-of-state service and dates of
assignment.
(c) A person who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection and who
does not renew his or her license within ninety (90) days of returning to the
Commonwealth shall be required to comply with the provisions of this
chapter governing renewal of a license that has expired.
(d) If a resident of the Commonwealth has been issued an "under 21" or "under
21 CDL" operator's license and the person is unable to renew the license on
the date of his or her twenty-first birthday, the "under 21" or "under 21 CDL"
operator's license shall be valid for ninety (90) days beyond the date of the
person's twenty-first birthday.
(4) (a) Any person who served in the active Armed Forces of the United States,
including the Coast Guard, and any member of the National Guard or Reserve
Component who completed the member's term of service and was released,
separated, discharged, or retired therefrom under either an honorable
discharge or a general under honorable conditions discharge may, at the time
of initial application or application for renewal or duplicate, request that an
operator's license or a personal identification card issued under this chapter
bear the word "veteran" on the face or the back of the license or personal
Page 16 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
identification card.
(b) The designation shall be in a style and format considered appropriate by the
Transportation Cabinet. Prior to obtaining a designation requested under this
subsection, the applicant shall present to the circuit clerk[cabinet] as proof of
eligibility, an original or copy of his or her:
1. Unexpired Veteran Identification Card or Veteran Health Identification
Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;
2. DD-2, DD-214, DD-256, DD-257, or NGB-22 form; or
3. Unexpired Geneva Conventions Identification Card issued by the United
States Department of Defense.
The cabinet shall not be liable for fraudulent or misread forms presented.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish forms and procedures for facilitating the addition of a
motorcycle endorsement to an existing operator's license, both electronically and by
mail, in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
Section 10. KRS 186.417 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue to any felony offender, if the felony offender
is eligible, released from the Kentucky Department of Corrections, a county jail or
other local or regional correctional facility, if and when funds are available, or a
Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Kentucky on home incarceration,
parole, completed service of sentence, shock probation, or pardon, a personal
identification card or, if the felony offender is eligible, an operator's license. An
offender who wishes to obtain a personal identification card or operator's license
shall provide proper documentation to comply with the provisions of this section.
(2) Proper documentation under subsection (1) of this section shall consist of:
(a) The offender's certificate of birth;
(b) A copy of the offender's resident record card and parole certificate or notice of
Page 17 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
discharge;
(c) A photograph of the offender, printed on plastic card or paper; and
(d) A release letter that shall contain the offender's:
1. Full legal name, subject to the information available to the Kentucky
Department of Corrections or a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility
located in Kentucky;
2. Discharge/release date;
3. Signature;
4. Social Security number;
5. Date of birth;
6. Present Kentucky address where he or she resides; and
7. Physical description.
(3) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue to any felony offender, if the felony offender
is eligible, probated or conditionally discharged by the court and under the
supervision of the Division of Probation and Parole or the United States Probation
Office, a personal identification card or, if the felony offender is eligible, an
operator's license. An offender who wishes to obtain a personal identification card
or operator's license shall provide proper documentation to comply with the
provisions of this section.
(4) Proper documentation under subsection (3) of this section shall consist of:
(a) The offender's certificate of birth;
(b) The offender's sentencing order;
(c) A photograph of the offender, printed on plastic card or paper; and
(d) A notarized release letter, signed by the supervising officer verifying the
offender's status on supervision, that shall contain the offender's:
1. Full legal name, subject to the information available to the Division of
Probation and Parole or the United States Probation Office;
Page 18 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
2. Signature;
3. Social Security number;
4. Date of birth;
5. Present Kentucky address where he or she resides; and
6. Physical description.
(5) The offender shall present the documentation identified in subsection (2) or (4) of
this section to the circuit clerk[cabinet] within thirty (30) calendar days from the
date of the release letter and shall be responsible for paying the fee for the personal
identification card or operator's license pursuant to KRS 186.531.
(6) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish procedures for current inmates in
state and federal prisons, who are deemed eligible by prison officials, to be issued
operator's licenses to engage in work release activities or reentry initiatives. The
administrative regulations shall address, at a minimum:
(a) The information required for application, which shall include all information
in paragraph (b) of this subsection which is germane to a current inmate. For
purposes of this paragraph, the facility in which the inmate is housed shall be
considered the inmate's residence;
(b) Required documentation from the Department of Corrections or the Federal
Bureau of Prisons that the inmate meets the security criteria to be eligible for
work outside of the facility;
(c) Procedures for license issuance; and
(d) Restrictions on use of the license, including a requirement that the inmate
shall surrender the license to prison officials when the inmate is not engaged
in work outside the facility.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the circuit clerk[cabinet] shall
process applications for operator's licenses and personal identification cards under
Page 19 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
this section in the same manner as in KRS 186.412 and 186.4122.
(8) The Transportation Cabinet may enter into an agreement with the Kentucky
Department of Corrections, the United States Probation Office, or the Federal
Bureau of Prisons to use a mobile unit to begin the issuance process in this section.
Section 11. KRS 186.418 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall implement a voluntary statewide child
identification program. The program shall issue a photo personal identification card
to a child two (2) to fifteen (15) years of age.
(2) A parent or guardian may apply for a child identification card under this section at
the circuit clerk's office in the county in which the child resides[cabinet].
Application for a child identification card shall be accompanied by a Social
Security card and a birth certificate for the child or other proof of the child's date of
birth as provided under KRS 186.412. The card shall not contain the child's Social
Security number.
(3) (a) If the child's parent or guardian wishes to obtain a travel ID child
identification card, the circuit clerk[cabinet] shall scan the application and
supporting documentation, capture a photograph of the child in accordance
with the provisions of KRS 186.4102(1), and submit the application,
documentation, and photograph to the cabinet, who shall issue the child
identification card by mail.
(b) If the child's parent or guardian does not wish to obtain a travel ID child
identification card, the circuit clerk[cabinet] shall scan the application,
capture a photograph of the child in accordance with the provisions of KRS
186.4102(1), and submit the application, documentation, and photograph to
the cabinet, who shall issue the child identification card by mail.
(c) A parent or guardian applying under this section shall not be required to
surrender the child's birth certificate for image capture, image storage, or
Page 20 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
image transmission to any entity, including the federal government, unless
express consent is given by the parent or guardian during the course of
obtaining a voluntary travel ID child identification card.
(4) A child identification card issued under this section shall contain the child's name
and the toll-free number of the Kentucky missing persons clearinghouse,
Department of Kentucky State Police. The descriptive data and a photo image of the
child shall be stored in the Kentucky driver's license information system and may
be retrieved and used by public agencies subject to the provisions of the Driver's
Privacy Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. sec. 2721, and may also be used by the Kentucky
missing persons clearinghouse.
(5) The fee for a child identification card shall be six dollars ($6), of which:
(a) Four dollars ($4) shall be deposited into the KYTC photo license account
established in KRS 174.056; and
(b) Two dollars ($2) shall be deposited into the Circuit Court clerk salary
account established in Section 34 of this Act.
(6) A child identification card shall expire every four (4) years on the child's birthday.
Within the time period that the child identification card is valid, the card may be
updated with a new photograph and information. The fee for an updated card shall
be six dollars ($6), with the fee distributed in the same manner as the fee for an
initial card as described in subsection (5) of this section.
(7) If a parent or guardian complies with the requirements of KRS 186.403 and
186.419, the parent or guardian may request that the child identification card issued
to a minor child under this section be a voluntary travel ID identity document under
KRS 186.403.
(8) A child identification card issued under this section shall contain a denotation that
either:
(a) The child identification card is a voluntary travel ID identity document that
Page 21 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II,
and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or
(b) The identity document shall not be used for federal identification purposes.
Section 12. KRS 186.435 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a licensed driver who becomes
a Kentucky resident shall, within thirty (30) days of establishing residency, apply
for a Kentucky operator's license to the office of the circuit clerk of the county in
which the person has established his or her domicile[Transportation Cabinet].
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall, before issuing a person a Kentucky operator's
license, verify through the National Drivers Register that the person applying for a
Kentucky operator's license does not currently have his or her operator's license or
driving privilege suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction.
(3) A person who is not a United States citizen but who has been granted permanent
resident status by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United
States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, and who is a Kentucky
resident, shall follow the same procedures for applying for an original, renewal,
transfer, or duplicate operator's license as persons who are United States citizens.
(4) A licensed driver from another jurisdiction who:
(a) Is not a United States citizen;
(b) Has not been granted permanent resident status by the United States
Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and
Immigration Services;
(c) Becomes a Kentucky resident; and
(d) Wishes to operate a motor vehicle;
shall, within thirty (30) days of establishing residency, apply for a Kentucky
operator's license under the provisions of KRS 186.4121.
Section 13. KRS 186.442 is amended to read as follows:
Page 22 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall, before issuing or renewing a Kentucky operator's
license, verify through the National Drivers Register that the person applying for an
initial or renewal Kentucky operator's license does not currently have his or her
operator's license or driving privilege suspended or revoked in another licensing
jurisdiction.
(2) If the person's operator's license or driving privilege is currently suspended or
revoked in another licensing jurisdiction for a traffic offense where the conviction
for the offense is less than five (5) years old, the Transportation Cabinet shall not
issue the person an initial or renewal Kentucky operator's license until the person
resolves the matter in the other licensing jurisdiction and complies with the
provisions of this chapter.
(3) A person whose operator's license has been suspended or revoked in another
licensing jurisdiction, or the holder of a Kentucky operator's license whose driving
privileges have been suspended in another licensing jurisdiction, may be issued a
Kentucky license, or may renew a Kentucky license if:
(a) The conviction causing the suspension or revocation is more than five (5)
years old;
(b) The conviction is for a traffic offense other than a felony traffic offense or a
habitual violator offense; and
(c) The person has been a resident of the Commonwealth for at least five (5)
years prior to the date of application for issuance or renewal.
(4) (a) A person applying for an operator's license under subsection (3) of this
section shall submit an application to the circuit clerk of the county in which
the person resides[cabinet], who shall electronically scan the application and
supporting documents, along with a photograph of the applicant captured in
accordance with KRS 186.4102(1), into the cabinet database.
(b) The circuit clerk[cabinet] shall review the person's documentation, including
Page 23 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
the person's photograph, in the cabinet database. If the documentation is
verified as accurate, and if the person successfully completes any
examinations required under KRS 186.480 and pays the reinstatement fee
required under KRS 186.531, the circuit clerk[cabinet] shall present the
applicant with a temporary operator's license, which shall be valid for thirty
(30) days, until a permanent operator's license is mailed to the applicant by
the Transportation Cabinet.
(5) A person issued a Kentucky operator's license in accordance with subsection (3) of
this section shall be issued an operator's license marked "Valid in Kentucky Only"
and shall sign a statement that the person understands that he or she may be subject
to arrest and detention if stopped by a law enforcement officer in another state
while operating a motor vehicle on this restricted license.
(6) If a person granted a license under subsection (3) of this section satisfies the
requirements to have the suspension or revocation in another state lifted, the person
shall apply to the circuit clerk[cabinet] to be issued a new license without the
restrictions outlined in subsection (3) of this section.
(7) The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not apply to a commercial
driver's license.
Section 14. KRS 186.450 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who is at least fifteen (15) years of age may apply for an instruction
permit to operate a motor vehicle. Except as provided in subsection (9) of this
section, a person who possesses a valid intermediate motor vehicle operator's
license issued under KRS 186.452 or a person who is at least eighteen (18) years of
age may apply for an instruction permit to operate a motorcycle. A holder of either
a motor vehicle or motorcycle instruction permit may also operate a moped under
that permit. A person applying for an instruction permit under this section shall
make application to the circuit clerk of the county where the person
Page 24 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
resides[Transportation Cabinet]. A person applying for an instruction permit shall
be required to comply with the following:
(a) If the person is under the age of eighteen (18), the instruction permit
application shall be signed by the applicant's parent or legal guardian. If the
person does not have a living parent or does not have a legal guardian, the
instruction permit application shall be signed by a person willing to assume
responsibility for the applicant pursuant to KRS 186.590;
(b) If the person is under the age of eighteen (18) and in the custody of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the instruction permit application
shall be signed by:
1. The applicant's parent, legal guardian, grandparent, adult sibling, aunt,
or uncle if the parental rights have not been terminated in accordance
with KRS Chapter 625;
2. The foster parent with whom the applicant resides;
3. Another person who is at least age eighteen (18) and is willing to
assume responsibility for the applicant pursuant to KRS 186.590; or
4. The applicant, without another person, upon verification by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services in accordance with KRS 605.102 that
shall include proof of financial responsibility in accordance with KRS
186.590(2); and
(c) All applicants for an instruction permit shall comply with the examinations
required by KRS 186.480.
(2) If an applicant successfully passes the examinations required by KRS 186.480, the
applicant shall be issued an instruction permit upon payment of the fee set forth in
KRS 186.531.
(3) (a) An instruction permit to operate a motor vehicle shall be valid for four (4)
years and may be renewed. An instruction permit to operate a motorcycle
Page 25 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
shall be valid for one (1) year and may be renewed one (1) time.
(b) Except as provided in KRS 186.415, a person who has attained the age of
sixteen (16) years and is under the age of eighteen (18) years shall have held
an instruction permit a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days before
applying for an intermediate license and shall have held an intermediate
license for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days before applying for
an operator's license.
(c) A person who was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time of application
for an instruction permit and is eighteen (18) years of age or older shall have
the instruction permit a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days and
complete a driver training program under KRS 186.410(4) before applying for
an operator's license.
(d) A person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and is under the age of
twenty-one (21) years at the time of application for an instruction permit shall
have the instruction permit a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days
before applying for an operator's license.
(e) A person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of
application for an instruction permit shall have the instruction permit a
minimum of thirty (30) days before applying for an operator's license.
(f) In accordance with KRS 176.5062(5), a person whose motorcycle instruction
permit has expired may apply to the circuit clerk[cabinet] to receive a
motorcycle operator's license or endorsement if the person presents proof of
successful completion of a motorcycle safety education course approved by
the Transportation Cabinet under KRS 176.5061 to 176.5069.
(4) (a) A person shall have the instruction permit in his or her possession at all times
when operating a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped upon the highway.
(b) When operating a motor vehicle, a motor vehicle instruction permit holder
Page 26 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
shall be accompanied by a person with a valid operator's license who is at
least twenty-one (21) years of age occupying the seat beside the operator at all
times.
(c) The requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection shall not apply to a
motor vehicle instruction permit holder being supervised on a multiple-
vehicle driving range by a driver training instructor affiliated with a driver
training school licensed under KRS Chapter 332 or a public or nonpublic
secondary school.
(5) A person with an instruction permit who is under the age of eighteen (18) shall not
operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped between the hours of 12 midnight
and 6 a.m. unless the person can demonstrate good cause for driving, including but
not limited to emergencies, involvement in school-related activities, or involvement
in work-related activities.
(6) Except when accompanied by a driver training instructor affiliated with a driver
training school licensed under KRS Chapter 332 or a public or nonpublic secondary
school, a person with an instruction permit who is under the age of eighteen (18)
years shall not operate a motor vehicle at any time when accompanied by more than
one (1) unrelated person who is under the age of twenty (20) years. A peace officer
shall not stop or seize a person nor issue a uniform citation for a violation of this
subsection if the officer has no other cause to stop or seize the person other than a
violation of this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to any operator of a
vehicle registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(4) who is engaged in
agricultural activities.
(7) A violation under subsection (4), (5), or (6) of this section, a conviction for a
moving violation under KRS Chapter 189 for which points are assessed by the
cabinet, or a conviction for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) shall add an additional
minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of the violation before a
Page 27 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
person who is under the age of eighteen (18) years may apply for an intermediate
license to operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped.
(8) A person under the age of eighteen (18) who accumulates more than six (6) points
against his or her driving privilege may have the driving privilege suspended
pursuant to KRS Chapter 186 or probated by the court.
(9) An applicant who presents evidence of successful completion of an approved rider
training course under KRS 176.5062 shall not be required to obtain a motorcycle
instruction permit prior to obtaining a motorcycle operator's license.
(10) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations, in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, to establish procedures for:
(a) Minors who reside with individuals in informal guardianship arrangements to
have an adult who resides with them sign the minor's application and assume
responsibility in accordance with subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Individuals who have signed for responsibility under subsection (1) of this
section to rescind that assumption of responsibility;
(c) Notifying minors when an adult has rescinded responsibility under subsection
(1) of this section; and
(d) Allowing minors for whom an adult has rescinded responsibility under
subsection (1) of this section, to obtain a new signature of an individual
assuming responsibility without having to retake any examinations the minor
has successfully passed.
Section 15. KRS 186.480 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall examine every applicant for an
operator's license as identified in KRS 186.635, except as otherwise provided in this
section. The examination shall be held in the county where the applicant resides
unless:
(a) The applicant is granted written permission by the circuit clerk of the county
Page 28 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
in which the applicant resides[Transportation Cabinet] to take the
examination in another county; or
(b) The applicant is tested using a bioptic telescopic device.
(2) The examination shall include a test of the applicant's eyesight to ensure
compliance with the visual acuity and visual field standards set forth in KRS
186.577. The vision testing outlined in this subsection shall be administered under
the provisions established in KRS 186.577 at, or prior to, the time of application.
The examination shall also include a test of the applicant's ability to read and
understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic, the applicant's
knowledge of traffic laws, and an actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to
exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an applicant who:
(a) At the time of application, holds a valid operator's license from another state,
provided that state affords a reciprocal exemption to a Kentucky resident;
(b) At the time of application for a motorcycle instruction permit or motorcycle
operator's license, presents evidence of successful completion of an approved
rider training course under KRS 176.5062; or
(c) Is a citizen of the Commonwealth who has been serving in the United States
military and has allowed his or her operator's license to expire.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for a
motorcycle operator's license who does not present evidence of successful
completion of an approved rider training course under KRS 176.5062 shall be
required to show his or her ability to operate a motorcycle. An applicant who
successfully completes the skills portion of the test under this subsection on a:
(a) Three (3) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator's license
restricted to the operation of three (3) wheeled motorcycles under KRS
186.447; or
Page 29 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(b) Two (2) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator's license
without the restriction identified in KRS 186.447, and may operate both two
(2) and three (3) wheeled motorcycles.
(4) Any person whose intermediate license or operator's license is denied, suspended,
or revoked for cause shall apply for reinstatement at the termination of the period
for which the license was denied, suspended, or revoked by submitting to the
examination. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any person whose
license was suspended for failure to meet the conditions described in KRS 186.411
when, within one (1) year of suspension, the driving privileges of the person are
reinstated.
(5) An applicant shall not use an autocycle for road skills testing administered under
the provisions of this section.
(6) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall include, in the educational materials
it produces for prospective drivers, information about the purposes, processes, and
benefits of the organ donation program.
Section 16. KRS 186.510 is amended to read as follows:
The licensee shall have his or her license in his or her immediate possession at all times
when driving a motor vehicle and shall display it upon demand to a circuit clerk, a peace
officer, a member of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or a field deputy or
inspector of the Department of Vehicle Regulation or Transportation Cabinet or, pursuant
to KRS 67A.075 or 83A.088, a safety officer who is in the process of securing
information to complete an accident report. It shall be a defense to any charge under this
section if the person so charged produces in court an operator's license, issued to him or
her before his or her arrest and valid at the time of his or her arrest.
Section 17. KRS 186.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person whose license, instruction permit, or personal identification card has
been legitimately lost or destroyed, shall apply to the circuit clerk of the county in
Page 30 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
which the most recent permanent license, instruction permit, or personal
identification card was obtained[Transportation Cabinet] in order to make
application for a duplicate license, instruction permit, or personal identification
card. The person shall furnish satisfactory proof by affidavit substantiating the loss
or destruction when applying for a duplicate[ license].
(2) The fee for a duplicate license, instruction permit, or personal identification card
shall be according to the schedule set forth in KRS 186.531.
Section 18. KRS 186.531 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "AOC Fund" or "AOCF" means the Circuit Court clerk salary account
created in Section 34 of this Act;
(b) "GF" means the general fund;
(c)[(b)] "IP" means instruction permit;
(d)[(c)] "License Fund" or "LF" means the KYTC photo license account created
in KRS 174.056;
(e)[(d)] "MC" means motorcycle;
(f)[(e)] "MC Fund" or "MCF" means the motorcycle safety education program
fund established in KRS 176.5065;
(g)[(f)] "OL" means operator's license; and
(h)[(g)] "PIDC" means personal identification card.
(2) The fees imposed for voluntary travel ID operator's licenses, instruction permits,
and personal identification cards shall be as follows. The fees received shall be
distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an
eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF AOCF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $48 $38 $10 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $18 $13.50 $4.50 $0 $0
Page 31 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $9.25 $4 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $18 $11 $5 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $18 $11 $2 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $48 $28.50 $9.50 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $58 $35 $13 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $28 $19 $6 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $10 $3.50 $1.50 $0
[ Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $48 $48 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $18 $18 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $18 $16 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $18 $13 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $48 $38 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $58 $48 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $28 $25 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0]
(3) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the fees imposed for standard
operator's licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards shall be as
follows. The fees received shall be distributed as shown in the table. The fees
shown[ and], unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF AOCF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $43 $35 $8 $0 $0
Page 32 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $11.50 $3.50 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $9.25 $3 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $9 $4 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $10 $1 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $25.50 $7.50 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $53 $32 $11 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $16 $4 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $10 $3.50 $1.50 $0
PIDC (no fixed address) under
KRS 186.4122(5)/186.4123(5)
(initial, duplicate, or corrected) $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
[ Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $43 $43 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $15 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $13 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $10 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $33 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $53 $43 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $20 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
PIDC (no fixed address) under
KRS 186.4122(5)/186.4123(5)
Page 33 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(initial, duplicate, or corrected) $0 $0 $0 $0]
(4) The fee for a four (4) year original or renewal license issued pursuant to KRS
186.4101 shall be fifty percent (50%) of the amount shown in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section. The distribution of fees shown in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall also be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for licenses that are issued for
four (4) years.
(5) Any fee for any identity document applied for using alternative technology under
KRS 186.410 and 186.4122 shall be distributed in the same manner as a document
applied for in person with the circuit clerk[cabinet].
(6) (a) An applicant for an original or renewal operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card
shall be requested by the circuit clerk[cabinet] to make a donation to promote
an organ donor program.
(b) The donation under this subsection shall be added to the regular fee for an
original or renewal motor vehicle operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card.
One (1) donation may be made per issuance or renewal of a license or any
combination thereof.
(c) The fee shall be paid to the circuit clerk[cabinet] and shall be forwarded by
the clerk[cabinet] on a monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks'
Trust for Life, and such moneys are hereby appropriated to be used
exclusively for the purpose of promoting an organ donor program. A donation
under this subsection shall be voluntary and may be refused by the applicant
at the time of issuance or renewal.
(7) In addition to the fees outlined in this section, the following individuals, upon
application for an initial or renewal operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card, shall pay an additional application fee of thirty dollars
Page 34 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
($30), which shall be deposited in the photo license account:
(a) An applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident and who
applies under KRS 186.4121 or 186.4123; or
(b) An applicant who is applying for a instruction permit, operator's license, or
personal identification card without a photo under KRS 186.4102(9).
(8) (a) Except for individuals exempted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, an
applicant for relicensing after revocation or suspension shall pay a
reinstatement fee of forty dollars ($40).
(b) The reinstatement fee under this subsection shall be distributed by the State
Treasurer as follows:
1. Thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be deposited into the photo license
account; and
2. Five dollars ($5) shall be deposited into a trust and agency fund to be
used in defraying the costs and expenses of administering a driver
improvement program for problem drivers.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to:
1. Any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the
conditions set out in KRS 186.411 when, within one (1) year of
suspension, the driving privileges of the individual are reinstated; or
2. A student who has had his or her license revoked pursuant to KRS
159.051.
(9) As payment for any fee identified in this section, circuit clerks[the cabinet]:
(a) Shall accept cash and personal checks;
(b) May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS 45.345; and
(c) May enter into billing agreements with homeless shelters, health care
facilities, or social service agencies that serve individuals without an
established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return.
Page 35 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(10) There shall be no fee assessed for the initial, renewal, or duplicate standard personal
identification card to an individual, if the individual:
(a) Does not possess a valid operator's license or a commercial driver's license;
and
(b) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age on or before the next regular election.
Section 19. KRS 186.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, when any person, after
applying for or receiving an operator's license or personal identification card,
moves from the address named in the application or on the identity document issued
to the person, or when the name of a identity document holder is changed, by
marriage or otherwise, the person shall within ten (10) days after the change apply
to the circuit clerk in the person's county of residence[Transportation Cabinet] for
the issuance of a corrected license. The fee for a corrected license shall be as set
forth in KRS 186.531.
(2) If an identity document holder's street name or postal address is changed and the
person has not moved to a new residence, the person shall apply to the circuit clerk
in the person's county of residence[ cabinet] for a corrected identity document,
which shall be issued free of charge.
(3) If a person receives an identity document that contains an error, the person shall
apply to the circuit clerk to whom the person made application for the identity
document[cabinet] for a corrected identity document, which shall be issued free of
charge.
Section 20. KRS 186.577 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The following persons shall submit to a test of visual acuity and visual field at
the time of application or renewal:
1. All persons applying for an initial or renewal operator's license;
2. All persons applying for an initial or renewal instruction permit; and
Page 36 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
3. Any person required to complete an examination under KRS 186.635.
(2) Vision testing under this section shall be administered to any person:
(a) Applying for an initial operator's license, an initial instruction permit, or
reinstatement of a license when vision must be tested as required in KRS
186.480:
1. Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or
2. By Kentucky State Police at the time of application;
(b) Applying for operator's license renewal or instruction permit renewal:
1. Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or
2. By the circuit clerk[Transportation Cabinet] at the time of application;
or
(c) Identified in Kentucky administrative regulations promulgated by the
Transportation Cabinet or the Kentucky State Police as being required to
undergo the exam required by KRS 186.480.
(3) (a) Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the
visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet without
corrective lenses shall not have a restriction placed on their driving privileges.
(b) Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the
visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet with corrective
lenses shall have their driving privileges restricted to mandate the use of the
corrective lenses.
(c) If a person fails to meet a 20/40 visual acuity standard or the visual field
standard established by the cabinet, the person shall be referred to a vision
specialist for examination.
(4) A person referred to a vision specialist under subsection (3) of this section whose
visual acuity is 20/60 or better and who meets or exceeds the visual field standard
established by the cabinet shall be eligible to test for an instruction permit or
Page 37 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
operator's license, or shall be eligible for operator's license renewal. If corrective
lenses were prescribed by the vision specialist, the person's driving privileges shall
be restricted to mandate the use of the corrective lenses.
(5) Vision tests administered under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be deemed to
meet the testing provisions outlined in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, if the
person submits a driver vision testing form that complies with the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section and the form has been completed by:
(a) A vision specialist; or
(b) An osteopath, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse who is
credentialed by the cabinet to perform vision testing under this section.
(6) All driver vision testing forms completed under subsection (5) of this section shall:
(a) Attest that the applicant meets or exceeds the visual acuity standard and visual
field standard established by the cabinet;
(b) Only be valid if the vision specialist or the credentialed osteopath,
credentialed physician, or credentialed advanced practice registered nurse
signed and completed the vision testing form less than twelve (12) months
prior to the date of application or renewal;
(c) State whether the driving privileges of the applicant shall be restricted to
mandate the use of corrective lenses; and
(d) Clearly indicate that the vision testing under this section is a screening for
minimum vision standards established in this section and is not a complete
eye examination.
(7) Any person seeking application or permit under subsection (1) of this section shall
attest that he or she has submitted to and passed the visual acuity and visual field
tests required under this section.
(8) Any person renewing an operator's license under KRS 186.416 shall be exempt
from the vision testing requirements outlined in this section.
Page 38 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(9) Persons who meet the requirements of KRS 186.578 and are issued operator's
licenses under KRS 186.579 shall:
(a) Have their driving privileges restricted to the use of a bioptic telescopic
device; and
(b) Be exempt from this section.
(10) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section, including but not
limited to establishing visual field standards, the creation of a driver vision testing
form, and establishing a credentialing process for osteopaths, physicians, and
advanced practice registered nurses to conduct vision testing under this section.
(11) The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Implement a system for electronic transmission of driver vision testing forms
and accompanying documentation; and
(b) Assess a fee to an applicant to cover the administrative costs of performing
on-site vision testing. Any funds received from this fee shall be deposited into
the photo license account established in KRS 174.056.
Section 21. KRS 186.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the circuit clerk refuses to issue an operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card to an applicant, the applicant may appeal the
decision of the circuit clerk to the cabinet.
(2) If any person is aggrieved by any final order of the cabinet relating to the denial,
revocation, suspension, or cancellation of an operator's license, instruction permit,
or personal identification card,[ or motorcycle operator's license] other than orders
of revocation or suspension when the facts render revocation or suspension
mandatory, the person[he] may file a petition for judicial review in the Circuit
Court of the county in which the person[he] resides, or in the Franklin Circuit
Page 39 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 22. KRS 186.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless otherwise indicated:
(1) "Cabinet," as used in KRS 186.400 to 186.640, means the Transportation Cabinet;
except as specifically designated, "cabinet," as used in KRS 186.020 to 186.270,
means the Transportation Cabinet only with respect to motor vehicles, other than
commercial vehicles; "cabinet," as used in KRS 186.020 to 186.270, means the
Department of Vehicle Regulation when used with respect to commercial vehicles;
(2) "Highway" means every way or place of whatever nature when any part of it is
open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, license, or privilege, for the
purpose of vehicular traffic;
(3) "Manufacturer" means any person engaged in manufacturing motor vehicles who
will, under normal conditions during the year, manufacture or assemble at least ten
(10) new motor vehicles;
(4) "Motor vehicle" means in KRS 186.020 to 186.260, all vehicles, as defined in
paragraph (a) of subsection (8) of this section, which are propelled otherwise than
by muscular power. As used in KRS 186.400 to 186.640, it means all vehicles, as
defined in paragraph (b) of subsection (8) of this section, which are self-propelled.
"Motor vehicle" shall not include a moped as defined in this section, but for
registration purposes shall include low-speed vehicles and military surplus vehicles
as defined in this section and vehicles operating under KRS 189.283;
(5) "Moped" means either a motorized bicycle whose frame design may include one (1)
or more horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank so long as it also has pedals, or
a motorized bicycle with a step-through type frame which may or may not have
pedals rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not
exceeding fifty (50) cubic centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring
clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and capable
Page 40 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour;
(6) "Operator" means any person in actual control of a motor vehicle upon a highway;
(7) (a) "Owner" means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or a person who
pursuant to a bona fide sale has received physical possession of the vehicle
subject to any applicable security interest.
(b) A vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease, with
the vendee or lessee entitled to possession of the vehicle, upon performance of
the contract terms, for a period of three hundred sixty-five (365) days or more
and with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in
the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the
conditional vendee or lessee, or if a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to
possession, the conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the
owner.
(c) A licensed motor vehicle dealer who transfers physical possession of a motor
vehicle to a purchaser pursuant to a bona fide sale, and complies with the
requirements of KRS 186A.220, shall not be deemed the owner of that motor
vehicle solely due to an assignment to his or her dealership or a certificate of
title in the dealership's name. Rather, under these circumstances, ownership
shall transfer upon delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser, subject to any
applicable security interest;
(8) (a) "Vehicle," as used in KRS 186.020 to 186.260, includes all agencies for the
transportation of persons or property over or upon the public highways of this
Commonwealth and all vehicles passing over or upon said highways, except
electric low-speed scooters, road rollers, road graders, farm tractors, vehicles
on which power shovels are mounted, such other construction equipment
customarily used only on the site of construction and which is not practical for
the transportation of persons or property upon the highways, such vehicles as
Page 41 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
travel exclusively upon rails, and such vehicles as are propelled by electric
power obtained from overhead wires while being operated within any
municipality or where said vehicles do not travel more than five (5) miles
beyond the city limit of any municipality.
(b) As used in KRS 186.400 to 186.640, "vehicle" means every device in, upon,
or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a
public highway, except electric low-speed scooters, devices moved by human
and animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or which
derives its power from overhead wires;
(9) KRS 186.020 to 186.270 apply to motor vehicle licenses. KRS 186.400 to 186.640
apply to operator's licenses;
(10) "Dealer" means any person engaging in the business of buying or selling motor
vehicles;
(11) "Commercial vehicles" means all motor vehicles that are required to be registered
under the terms of KRS 186.050, but not including vehicles primarily designed for
carrying passengers and having provisions for not more than nine (9) passengers
(including driver), motorcycles, sidecar attachments, pickup trucks and passenger
vans which are not being used for commercial or business purposes, and motor
vehicles registered under KRS 186.060;
(12) "Resident" means any person who has established Kentucky as his or her state of
domicile. Proof of residency shall include but not be limited to a deed or property
tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing agreement. The possession
by an operator of a vehicle of a valid Kentucky operator's license shall be prima-
facie evidence that the operator is a resident of Kentucky;
(13) "Special status individual" means:
(a) "Asylee" means any person lawfully present in the United States who
possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice,
Page 42 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states "asylum status
granted indefinitely pursuant to Section 208 of the Immigration & Nationality
Act";
(b) "K-1 status" means the status of any person lawfully present in the United
States who has been granted permission by the United States Department of
Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service to enter the United States for
the purpose of marrying a United States citizen within ninety (90) days from
the date of that entry;
(c) "Refugee" means any person lawfully present in the United States who
possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States Department of Justice,
Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it states "admitted as a
refugee pursuant to Section 207 of the Immigration & Nationality Act"; and
(d) "Paroled in the Public Interest" means any person lawfully present in the
United States who possesses an I-94 card issued by the United States
Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service, on which it
states "paroled pursuant to Section 212 of the Immigration & Nationality Act
for an indefinite period of time";
(14) "Instruction permit" includes both motor vehicle instruction permits and motorcycle
instruction permits;
(15) "Motorcycle" means any motor driven vehicle that has a maximum speed that
exceeds fifty (50) miles per hour, has a seat or saddle for the use of the operator,
and is designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the
ground, including vehicles on which the operator and passengers ride in an enclosed
cab. Only for purposes of registration, "motorcycle" shall include a motor scooter,
an alternative-speed motorcycle, and an autocycle as defined in this section, but
shall not include a tractor or a moped as defined in this section;
(16) "Low-speed vehicle" means a motor vehicle that:
Page 43 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(a) Is self-propelled using an electric motor, combustion-driven motor, or a
combination thereof;
(b) Is four (4) wheeled; and
(c) Is designed to operate at a speed not to exceed twenty-five (25) miles per hour
as certified by the manufacturer;
(17) "Alternative-speed motorcycle" means a motorcycle that:
(a) Is self-propelled using an electric motor;
(b) Is three (3) wheeled;
(c) Has a fully enclosed cab and includes at least one (1) door for entry;
(d) Is designed to operate at a speed not to exceed forty (40) miles per hour as
certified by the manufacturer; and
(e) Is not an autocycle as defined in this section;
(18) "Multiple-vehicle driving range" means an enclosed area that is not part of a
highway or otherwise open to the public on which a number of motor vehicles may
be used simultaneously to provide driver training under the supervision of one (1)
or more driver training instructors;
(19) "Autocycle" means any motor vehicle that:
(a) Is equipped with a seat that does not require the operator to straddle or sit
astride it;
(b) Is designed to travel on three (3) wheels in contact with the ground;
(c) Is designed to operate at a speed that exceeds forty (40) miles per hour as
certified by the manufacturer;
(d) Allows the operator and passenger to ride either side-by-side or in tandem in a
seating area that may be enclosed with a removable or fixed top;
(e) Is equipped with a three (3) point safety belt system;
(f) May be equipped with a manufacturer-installed air bags or a roll cage;
(g) Is designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals; and
Page 44 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(h) Is not an alternative-speed motorcycle as defined in this section;
(20) "Military surplus vehicle" means a multipurpose wheeled surplus military vehicle
that:
(a) Is not operated using continuous tracks;
(b) Was originally manufactured for and sold directly to the Armed Forces of the
United States; and
(c) Was originally manufactured under the federally mandated requirements set
forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.7;
(21) "Livestock" means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes,
and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid
species;
(22) "Identity document" means an instruction permit, operator's license, or personal
identification card issued under KRS 186.4102, 186.412, 186.4121, 186.4122, and
186.4123 or a commercial driver's license issued under KRS Chapter 281A;
(23) "Travel ID," as it refers to an identity document, means a document that complies
with Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II;
(24) "Motor scooter" means a low-speed motorcycle that is:
(a) Equipped with wheels greater than sixteen (16) inches in diameter;
(b) Equipped with an engine greater than fifty (50) cubic centimeters;
(c) Designed to operate at a speed not to exceed fifty (50) miles per hour;
(d) Equipped with brake horsepower of two (2) or greater; and
(e) Equipped with a step-through frame or a platform for the operator's feet;
(25) "Alternative technology," as used in KRS 186.400 to 186.640, means methods used
by the cabinet to facilitate the issuance of operator's licenses and personal
identification cards outside of the normal in-person application at a circuit
clerk[cabinet] office, including but not limited to a cabinet mobile unit or online
services;
Page 45 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(26) "Electric motorcycle" means the same as "motorcycle" or "motor scooter" as
defined in this section, that is powered by a:
(a) Battery or equivalent energy storage device that can be charged with an
electric plug using an external electricity source; or
(b) Combination of an internal combustion engine and electric motor; and
(27) "Electric vehicle" means any vehicle that has plug-in charging capability, regardless
of whether the vehicle is powered by:
(a) An electric motor only; or
(b) A combination of an internal combustion engine and electric power.
Section 23. KRS 189A.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (e), or (f), the sole
license the person shall be eligible for is an ignition interlock license pursuant
to this section.
(b) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c) or (d), the person shall
be eligible for an ignition interlock license pursuant to this section and may be
eligible for a hardship license pursuant to KRS 189A.410.
(2) (a) A person may apply for an ignition interlock license anytime, including after
receiving the notices under KRS 189A.105 or after his or her license has been
suspended pursuant to this chapter.
(b) If at the time the person applies for an ignition interlock license, the person's
license has been suspended pursuant to this chapter, the person shall be
authorized to drive to:
1. An ignition interlock device provider to have a functioning ignition
interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle; and
2. The circuit clerk's office in the person's county of
Page 46 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
residence[Transportation Cabinet] to apply for[obtain] an ignition
interlock license;
This paragraph shall only apply within fourteen (14) days of the date printed
on the ignition interlock approval letter issued by the Transportation Cabinet
and if the person has the ignition interlock approval letter in the motor vehicle
or motorcycle.
(3) Before the Transportation Cabinet shall issue an ignition interlock license, the
person shall:
(a) Submit an application for an ignition interlock license;
(b) Provide proof of motor vehicle insurance;
(c) Provide an ignition interlock certificate of installation issued by an ignition
interlock device provider; and
(d) Provide any other information required by administrative regulations
promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS 189A.350.
(4) An ignition interlock license shall restrict the person to operating only a motor
vehicle or motorcycle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device, unless
the person qualifies for an employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.
This restriction shall remain in place for:
(a) If a person's license was suspended pretrial pursuant to KRS 189A.200, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.200(6);
(b) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.070 or 189A.107:
1. The required suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1); and
2. a. If the maximum suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1)(a) has
not yet been met, until the Transportation Cabinet has received a
declaration from the person's ignition interlock device provider, in
a form provided or approved by the cabinet, certifying that none of
the violations outlined in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has
Page 47 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
occurred:
i. For a first offense within a ten (10) year period of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) or for any offense of KRS
189A.010(1)(f), in the ninety (90) consecutive days; and
ii. For all subsequent offenses within a ten (10) year period of
KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive days;
prior to the date of releasing the ignition interlock device
restriction.
b. If any of the following occur, it shall be a violation of the ninety
(90) or one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement:
i. Failure to take any random breath alcohol concentration test
unless a review of the digital image confirms that the motor
vehicle or motorcycle was not occupied by a driver at the
time of the missed test;
ii. Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol
concentration of 0.02 or lower unless a subsequent test
performed within ten (10) minutes registers a breath alcohol
concentration lower than 0.02, and the digital image
confirms the same person provided both samples;
iii. Failure of the person, or his or her designee, to appear at the
ignition interlock device provider when required for
maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or
replacement of the device;
iv. Failure of the person to pay fees established pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section;
v. Tampering with an installed ignition interlock device with
Page 48 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
the intent of rendering it defective; or
vi. Altering, concealing, hiding, or attempting to alter, conceal,
or hide, the person's identity from the ignition interlock
device's camera while providing a breath sample;
(c) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.090, for the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.090(2); or
(d) If a person's license suspension was extended pursuant to KRS 189A.345, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.345(1).
(5) (a) The time period a person:
1. Holds a valid ignition interlock license pursuant to this section; or
2. Receives alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility;
shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the suspension periods
detailed in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the Transportation
Cabinet shall give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period the
person:
1. Held a valid ignition interlock license; or
2. Received alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility.
(c) A person shall not receive day-for-day credit for days the person utilized the
employer exemption in accordance with subsection (6) of this section and
drove an employer's motor vehicle or motorcycle not equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device.
(6) (a) A person with an ignition interlock license may operate a motor vehicle or
motorcycle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device if:
1. The person is required to operate an employer's motor vehicle or
Page 49 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
motorcycle in the course and scope of employment; and
2. The business entity that owns the motor vehicle or motorcycle is not
owned or controlled by the person.
(b) To qualify for the employer exemption, the person shall provide the
Transportation Cabinet with a sworn statement from his or her employer
stating that the person and business entity meet the requirements of paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an ignition interlock
device provider may charge the following fees:
1. An installation fee for an alternative fuel vehicle or a vehicle with a
push button starter not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130), an
installation fee for all other vehicles not to exceed one hundred dollars
($100);
2. A monthly fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);
3. A removal fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30);
4. A reset fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50); or
5. A missed appointment fee not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35).
(b) A person who is issued an ignition interlock license shall pay fees as
established in his or her lease agreement with the ignition interlock device
provider for any ignition interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle
or motorcycle. However, the fees shall never be more than allowed under
paragraph (a) of this subsection and are subject to paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
(c) Any person who has an income:
1. At or below two hundred percent (200%) but above one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only
seventy-five percent (75%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a)
Page 50 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
of this subsection;
2. At or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) but above one hundred
percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only fifty
percent (50%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
3. At or below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty
guidelines, shall pay only twenty-five percent (25%) of fees established
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;
As used in this paragraph, "federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning
as in KRS 205.5621. The Transportation Cabinet shall determine the person's
income and where that income places the person on the federal poverty
guidelines.
(d) Neither the Commonwealth, the Transportation Cabinet, nor any unit of state
or local government shall be responsible for payment of any costs associated
with an ignition interlock device.
(8) For a person issued an ignition interlock license under this section who is residing
outside of Kentucky, the Transportation Cabinet may accept an ignition interlock
certificate of installation from an ignition interlock device provider authorized to do
business in the state where the person resides if the ignition interlock device meets
the requirements of that state.
Section 24. KRS 281A.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except when driving under a commercial learner's permit and accompanied by the
holder of commercial driver's license valid for the vehicle being driven, no person
shall drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state unless the
person holds a valid commercial driver's license with applicable endorsements valid
for the vehicle he or she is driving.
(2) No person shall drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state
Page 51 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
while his or her driving privilege for a commercial or noncommercial motor vehicle
is suspended, revoked, or canceled, or while he or she is subject to a
disqualification, or in violation of an out-of-service order.
(3) The licensee shall have in his or her immediate possession at all times when
operating a motor vehicle his or her commercial driver's license, and shall display
the license upon demand to a circuit clerk, the Transportation Cabinet, a license
examiner, a peace officer, a State Police officer, or an inspector or officer of the
Department of Vehicle Regulation. It shall be a defense to a violator of this
subsection if the person so charged produces in court a commercial driver's license,
issued to him or her before his or her arrest or violation and which was valid at that
time.
Section 25. KRS 281A.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not be issued a commercial driver's license unless that person:
(a) Is a resident of this state;
(b) Holds a valid operator's license;
(c) Has complied with the provisions of KRS 281A.300;
(d) Except as provided in KRS 281A.165, has passed the knowledge and skills
tests for driving a commercial motor vehicle which comply with minimum
federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated in 49 C.F.R. pt.
383, as adopted by the cabinet; and
(e) Has satisfied all other safety requirements including those requirements
imposed by state law or federal regulation. The tests shall be prescribed and
conducted as set forth in KRS 281A.160.
(2) A commercial driver's license or commercial learner's permit shall not be issued to
a person while the person is subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial
motor vehicle or while the person's driver's license or driving privilege is
suspended, revoked, or canceled in any state or jurisdiction.
Page 52 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(3) A commercial driver's license shall not be issued to a person who has a commercial
driver's license issued by any other state unless the person first surrenders all such
licenses, which shall be returned to the issuing jurisdiction for cancellation.
(4) To ensure that an applicant for a commercial driver's license or commercial
learner's permit complies with the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, the circuit clerk[Transportation Cabinet] shall verify through the
commercial driver's license information system and national driver register that the
person applying for a Kentucky CDL does not currently have his or her operator's
license or driving privilege suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction.
If the person's operator's license or driving privilege is currently suspended or
revoked in another licensing jurisdiction, the circuit clerk[Transportation Cabinet]
shall not issue the person a Kentucky CDL until the person resolves the matter in
the other licensing jurisdiction and complies with the provisions of this chapter and
KRS Chapter 186.
Section 26. KRS 281A.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The application for a commercial driver's license or commercial learner's permit
shall include the following information:
(a) The applicant's full legal name, any nicknames or other names by which he or
she is known, and present Kentucky resident address. If the applicant's
mailing address is different from the resident address, the mailing address
shall also be included;
(b) A physical description of the applicant including sex, height, weight, eye
color, and race;
(c) The applicant's date of birth;
(d) The applicant's Social Security number;
(e) The applicant's signature;
(f) Certifications including those required by 49 C.F.R. secs. 383.71, 383.73, and
Page 53 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
384.206, as adopted by the cabinet;
(g) A consent to release driving record information;
(h) A valid Class D operator's license issued pursuant to KRS 186.4102 and
186.412;
(i) A birth certificate if the applicant does not hold a valid operator's license at
the time of application;
(j) The name of every jurisdiction in which the applicant has previously been
licensed to drive any type of motor vehicle during the ten (10) year period
immediately preceding the date of the application; and
(k) Any other information required by the cabinet.
(2) The cabinet or state police may require any other information needed in order to
process the application.
(3) When the holder of a commercial driver's license changes his or her name or
residence, the information shall be reported to the cabinet within ten (10) days. The
holder of a Class A, B, or C license shall make an application for a duplicate license
within thirty (30) days of changing his or her name or address.
(4) Any person whose commercial driver's license has been legitimately lost or
destroyed shall make an application for a duplicate. A person applying for a
duplicate within the time period for which the original license was issued shall
apply to the office of the circuit clerk in the county where the person
resides[Transportation Cabinet]. The person shall provide the clerk[cabinet] with
proof of the person's identity and a notarized affidavit with a raised seal explaining
in detail the loss or destruction of the original license.
(5) A person who is a resident of this state shall not drive a commercial motor vehicle
under the authority of a commercial driver's license issued by another jurisdiction.
(6) Any person who knowingly falsifies information or certifications required to obtain
a commercial driver's license, a commercial driver's license permit, or a duplicate
Page 54 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
commercial driver's license subsequent to an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS 186.570, shall be subject to suspension, revocation, or
cancellation of his or her commercial driver's license for a period of at least sixty
(60) consecutive days.
Section 27. KRS 281A.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person seeking a commercial driver's license or a commercial learner's permit
shall first apply in person to the circuit clerk of the county in which the applicant:
(a) Resides; or
(b) Is enrolled in a driver training school, if the applicant is not a Kentucky
resident[cabinet].
(2) The application shall be in the form prescribed by KRS 281A.140 as provided by
the cabinet. Except as provided in KRS 281A.160(6), each time a person applies for
a commercial driver's license, a commercial learner's permit, or seeks to upgrade or
change his or her commercial driver's license, the person shall be required to:
(a) Update the application; and
(b) Submit the appropriate fee to the circuit clerk[cabinet].
(3)[(2)] In addition to the fees for an operator's license under KRS 186.531, the
cabinet shall set fees by administrative regulation, in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A, for the following applications that shall not exceed:
(a) Forty dollars ($40) for each application for a commercial driver's license. The
fee shall be based on the class, type of license, endorsement, restriction, or
tests to be taken;
(b) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for each application for a commercial learner's
permit;
(c) Fifteen dollars ($15) for each application for a change or addition in class or
type of license, endorsement, or restriction; and
(d) Forty dollars ($40) for each application for a duplicate if it is the first
Page 55 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
duplicate applied for within the time period for which the original license was
issued. Sixty dollars ($60) for a second or subsequent duplicate applied for
within the time period for which the original license was issued. The fees
required for a duplicate shall be in addition to fees charged under
paragraph[subsection (2)] (c) of this subsection[section].
(4)[(3)] In addition to the fees for an operator's license KRS 186.531, the cabinet shall
set fees by administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, for the
following commercial driver's licenses that shall not exceed:
(a) Forty-five dollars ($45) for each initial or renewal of a commercial driver's
license;
(b) Sixty dollars ($60) for each transfer of a commercial driver's license; and
(c) Thirty dollars ($30) for each initial or renewal of a commercial driver's
license with an "S" endorsement.
(5)[(4)] All fees remitted to the circuit clerk[cabinet] shall be nonrefundable
regardless of whether the applicant completes the requirements for a commercial
driver's license or is tested.
(6)[(5)] All fees collected for the issuance of a commercial driver's license or a
commercial learner's permit shall be deposited into trust and agency accounts to be
used exclusively for the administration and implementation of this chapter, except
as prescribed in subsection (7)[(6)] of this section. The accounts shall not lapse but
shall be continuing from year to year.
(7)[(6)] All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be allocated between the
Transportation Cabinet and Department of Kentucky State Police, except a fifty
cent ($0.50) issuance fee shall be allocated to the general fund from issuance of a
commercial driver's license permit and a three dollar ($3) issuance fee shall be
allocated to the general fund from issuance of a commercial driver's license.
(8)[(7)] Any applicant who seeks reinstatement of his or her commercial driving
Page 56 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
privilege after a suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification shall pay a
reinstatement fee of fifty dollars ($50) in addition to those fees required by
subsection (2) of this section and shall satisfy the requirements of KRS 281A.160.
This fee shall not be required if his or her commercial driving privilege was
withdrawn only as a result of the withdrawal of his or her privilege to drive a
noncommercial motor vehicle.
(9)[(8)] As payment for any fee identified in this section, the circuit clerk[cabinet]:
(a) Shall accept cash and personal checks; and
(b) May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS 45.345.
Section 28. KRS 281A.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the State Police shall be
responsible for administering both the knowledge and skills test required by
KRS 281A.130.
(b) Prior to taking the knowledge test, a first-time applicant for a hazardous
materials endorsement shall complete the entry level driver training required
under 49 C.F.R. pt. 380.
(c) Applicants who fail the written knowledge test shall be permitted to retake the
written test on the next day the tests are administered. Applicants who fail the
written test six (6) times shall be required to wait three (3) days before taking
the knowledge test again. Applicants who subsequently fail the written test
three (3) additional times shall be required to wait three (3) days prior to
retaking the test.
(2) (a) Except as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, at the time a CDL
permit is issued:
1. An applicant who has held a Kentucky operator's license for thirty (30)
days or longer shall pay a skills-testing fee of fifty dollars ($50); and
2. An applicant who has held a Kentucky operator's license for less than
Page 57 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
thirty (30) days or an applicant who holds an out-of-state operator's
license and commercial learner's permit shall pay a skills-testing fee of
one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(b) There is created within the State Treasury a trust fund to be known as the
State Police CDL skills-testing fund. The fund shall be administered by the
State Police and shall receive all skills-testing and retesting fees collected
under paragraph (a) of this subsection and subsection (6)(e) of this section, in
addition to any grants, gifts, or appropriations of state or federal moneys and
any interest earned on moneys in the fund. Moneys in the fund shall not lapse
and shall be carried forward to the next succeeding fiscal year. The State
Police CDL skills-testing fund shall be used by the State Police to contract
with and train civilian CDL skills examiners and to improve the logistics of
the CDL skills-testing process.
(c) The State Police, upon request of an applicant who has passed both the vision
and knowledge tests, and has successfully completed all of the entry level
driver training required under 49 C.F.R. pt. 380 for the license class and
endorsements the applicant seeks, may schedule the applicant for the skills
test at the first available test date at a test site designated by the State Police
but not less than fourteen (14) days after the applicant has filed the application
and been issued a CDL permit. Except in extenuating circumstances, a retest
for a failed portion of the skills test shall be given within three (3) days of a
request of a retest.
(d) An applicant shall provide a class representative commercial vehicle, for the
class of CDL for which the applicant is testing, in which to take the skills test.
Unless the State Police grant an exemption at the time the application for
testing is made, the vehicle supplied under this paragraph shall be unloaded.
Upon arrival for the skills test, the applicant shall have in his or her
Page 58 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
possession a valid Kentucky operator's license and a valid CDL permit. A
CDL-licensed driver who is at least twenty-one (21) years old shall
accompany the applicant at all times the applicant is in operation of a
commercial vehicle.
(3) A testing fee shall not be charged to:
(a) An individual applying for a CDL with an "S" endorsement as defined in KRS
281A.170; or
(b) Military personnel applying for a CDL under KRS 281A.165.
(4) The State Police may authorize a third party to administer the skills test specified by
this section if:
(a) The test is the same that would otherwise be administered by the state; and
(b) The third party has entered into an agreement with this Commonwealth which
complies with requirements of 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.75, as adopted by the
Transportation Cabinet.
(5) The State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A that establish procedures that ensure an arm's-length relationship
is maintained between a third-party tester and any owner, officer, or employee of
any program offering commercial truck driving under the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System or a proprietary school licensed under KRS Chapter
165A.
(6) (a) Applicants shall be permitted to take the skills test for a particular class
vehicle an unlimited number of times; however, an applicant shall not retest
more than one (1) time in any twenty-four (24) hour period.
(b) The skills test shall consist of three (3) separate portions: pre-trip inspection,
basic maneuvering, and road skills. An applicant must achieve a score of at
least eighty percent (80%) on each portion of the skills test before a CDL may
be issued to the applicant. An applicant who passes one (1) or more portions
Page 59 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
of the skills test but does not pass all portions of the skills test shall retest only
on those portions of the skills test the applicant failed.
(c) An applicant who fails any portion of the skills test four (4) times shall be
notified by the State Police that the applicant is required to wait one (1) week
before retaking a portion of this skills test again.
(d) Failure of an applicant to notify the State Police at least forty-eight (48) hours
prior to missing an appointment for a skills test, or provide a written medical
excuse from a licensed physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician's assistant, shall be considered a failure on all parts of the skills test
scheduled to be given for the purposes of determining number of failures,
waiting periods, and retesting fees under paragraphs (c) and (e) of this
subsection for individual applicants. The fees for a missed appointment failure
shall be forfeited and retained in the State Police CDL skills-testing fund
established under this section. If the forty-eight (48) hour notice or medical
excuse is given, the fee shall be applied to the rescheduled test. A missed
appointment failure under this paragraph shall not be reported as a failure to
the board.
(e) Except as provided for in paragraph (d) of this subsection, at the time of
application for a retest under this subsection, the applicant shall pay a
retesting fee of fifty dollars ($50).
(7) (a) An applicant who seeks reinstatement of a commercial driver's license after a
suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification of less than one (1)
year shall pay the reinstatement fee as prescribed by KRS 281A.150(8)[(7)]
and shall receive his or her commercial driver's license with all endorsement
and restrictions that were in effect at the time of suspension. An applicant who
seeks reinstatement of a commercial driver's license after a suspension,
withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification of one (1) year or more shall
Page 60 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
submit to the skills, knowledge, and vision tests.
(b) Subject to paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection, a person who possessed a
Kentucky commercial driver's license that has expired for a period of less than
five (5) years and was not subject to suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or
disqualification for any reason at the time of expiration may have that license
reinstated, with all endorsements, without submitting to the skills and
knowledge tests by applying to the cabinet for renewal. Upon submission of
medical certification, driver self-certifications required under KRS
281A.140(1)(f), successful completion of any necessary criminal background
check, and review of the person's driving history record, the cabinet shall
issue a renewal CDL, with all endorsements, to an applicant under this
paragraph.
(c) A person who otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (b) of this
subsection whose CDL was subject to suspension or revocation solely for
failure to provide medical certification may apply for renewal of a CDL under
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) If the CDL held by a person who otherwise meets the requirements of
paragraph (b) of this subsection carried a hazardous materials endorsement,
and the applicant wishes to retain that endorsement, he or she shall complete
any examinations required for a hazardous materials endorsement renewal in
KRS 281A.180(2) prior to renewing the CDL under paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
(8) (a) The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to implement the provisions of this section.
(b) The State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to set forth the qualifications for contract examiners
Page 61 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
retained under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
Section 29. KRS 281A.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person initially applying for, or renewing, a Kentucky CDL or CLP shall
be required to undergo a state and national criminal history background check
of state and federal wanted or "hot file" records conducted by the State Police.
(b) All initial and renewal application forms for a Kentucky CDL or CLP shall
conspicuously state the following: "STATE LAW REQUIRES A STATE
AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AS A
CONDITION OF APPLYING FOR A KENTUCKY CDL. ANY PERSON
WHO REFUSES TO SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY
BACKGROUND CHECK SHALL NOT BE ELIGIBLE TO APPLY FOR,
OR BE ISSUED, A KENTUCKY CDL."
(2) The results of the state and national criminal history background checks shall be
sent to the cabinet for review within seventy-two (72) hours. An applicant for a
CLP may enroll in a commercial driver training program under the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System or a proprietary school licensed under
KRS Chapter 165A, and may be issued a CLP upon enrollment, however the status
of the applicant retaining the CLP shall not be determined until the results of the
background checks are made available to the cabinet. The cabinet shall inform an
applicant and the circuit clerk, based upon the criminal history background check,
of the applicant's eligibility to be issued a CLP or CDL. The cabinet shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
specify conditions that will cause a person to be denied a CLP or CDL based upon
the person's criminal history background check.
(3) Any fee charged by the State Police to conduct a criminal history background check
shall be paid by the applicant and shall not be refundable. Any fee charged to
conduct a criminal history background check shall be an amount not greater than
Page 62 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
the actual cost of processing the request and conducting the search.
(4) The criminal history background checks required by this section shall be in addition
to any type of background check that may be required by federal statute, rule,
regulation, or order.
Section 30. KRS 281A.320 is amended to read as follows:
Any person initially renewing a commercial driver's license or adding an endorsement
after September 30, 2002, shall apply for the renewal at least thirty (30) days prior to the
expiration date of the license. The purpose of the early renewal procedures is to ensure
the criminal history background check required under KRS 281A.300 may be completed
prior to the expiration date on the license. A person may obtain the information necessary
to conduct the criminal history background check from the circuit clerk[cabinet]. If the
person has a law enforcement agency other than the State Police conduct the background
check, the law enforcement agency may charge the person a nonrefundable fee for the
service. Any fee charged by any law enforcement agency to conduct a criminal history
background check shall be an amount not greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the search.
Section 31. KRS 116.0452 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of determining whether a voter registration application is received
during the period in which registration books are open under KRS 116.045(2), an
application shall be deemed timely received:
(a) In the case of registration with a motor vehicle driver's license application, if
the valid voter registration form of the applicant is accepted by the circuit
clerk[Transportation Cabinet] before the registration books are closed;
(b) In the case of registration by mail, if the valid voter registration form of the
applicant is legibly postmarked before the registration books are closed;
(c) In the case of registration with a voter registration agency, if the valid voter
registration form of the applicant is accepted at the voter registration agency
Page 63 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
before the registration books are closed; and
(d) In any other case, if the valid voter registration form of the applicant is
received by the appropriate county clerk, no later than 4 p.m. local time,
before the registration books are closed.
(2) The county clerk shall send notice to each applicant of the disposition of the
application.
(3) The name of a registered voter shall not be removed from the registration books
except:
(a) Upon request of the voter;
(b) As provided by KRS 116.113, upon notice of death, declaration of
incompetency, excusal from jury duty for not being a United States citizen, or
conviction of a felony; or
(c) Upon failure to respond to a confirmation mailing sent pursuant to KRS
116.112(3) and failure to vote or appear to vote and, if necessary, correct the
registration record of the voter's address in an election during the period
beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the
second general election for Federal office that occurs after the date of the
notice.
(4) The identity of the voter registration agency or circuit clerk's[Transportation
Cabinet] office through which any particular voter is registered shall not be
disclosed to the public.
Section 32. KRS 116.0455 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Each motor vehicle driver's license application, including any renewal
application, submitted to the appropriate motor vehicle authority shall serve as
an application for voter registration unless the applicant fails to sign the voter
registration application.
(b) An application for voter registration submitted under paragraph (a) of this
Page 64 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
subsection shall be considered as updating any previous voter registration by
the applicant.
(2) No information relating to the failure of an applicant for a motor vehicle driver's
license to sign a voter registration application may be used for any purpose other
than voter registration.
(3) (a) The Transportation Cabinet shall include a voter registration application form
as part of an application for a motor vehicle driver's license.
(b) The voter registration application portion of an application for a motor vehicle
driver's license shall comply with the requirements of Section 5 of Public Law
103-31, the National Voter Registration Act of 1993.
(4) Any change of address form submitted for purposes of a motor vehicle driver's
license shall serve as notification of change of address for voter registration for the
registrant involved unless the registrant states on the form that the change of
address is not for voter registration purposes.
(5) (a) A completed voter registration portion of an application for a motor vehicle
driver's license accepted by the circuit clerk[Transportation Cabinet] shall be
transmitted to the county clerk of the county of the applicant's voting
residence not later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance.
(b) If a voter registration application is accepted within five (5) days before the
last day for registration to vote in an election, the application shall be
transmitted to the county clerk of the county of the applicant's voting
residence not later than five (5) days after the date of acceptance.
(6) The circuit clerk[Transportation Cabinet] shall provide to the county clerk a
declination statement signed by an applicant if the applicant has declined to register
to vote.
Section 33. KRS 116.085 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a voter changes his or her place of residence to another location within the
Page 65 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
county, the clerk shall, upon application of the voter in person, by mail, or through
the circuit clerk[Transportation Cabinet], transfer the voter's registration record to
the proper precinct.
(2) When a registered voter changes his or her place of residence from one (1) precinct
to another within the same county before the registration books are closed and fails
to transfer his or her registration with the county clerk prior to the date the
registration books are closed, the voter shall be permitted to update the voting
records and to vote in the present election at the appropriate precinct for the current
address upon affirmation of his or her current address and signing the precinct list
as set forth in KRS 117.225. Before being permitted to vote, the voter shall also
confirm his or her identity as required in KRS 117.227 and complete the affidavit
which is required to be completed by a voter whose right to vote has been
challenged. The subscribed oaths shall be delivered to the county clerk and
investigated in accordance with KRS 117.245.
(3) When a registered voter changes his or her place of residence from one (1) precinct
to another precinct within the same county after the registration books close, the
voter shall be permitted to vote in the present election at the appropriate precinct for
the current address upon affirmation of his or her current address and signing the
precinct list as set forth in KRS 117.225. Before being permitted to vote, the voter
shall confirm his or her identity as required by KRS 117.227 and complete the
affidavit which is required to be completed by a voter whose right to vote is
challenged. The subscribed oaths shall be delivered to the county clerk and
investigated in accordance with KRS 117.245.
(4) (a) When the boundaries of a precinct are changed by law, placing a registered
voter in a new or different precinct, the clerk shall automatically transfer the
voter's registration record to the proper precinct and mail the voter a notice of
the change.
Page 66 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
(b) When the General Assembly enacts a new redistricting plan, the clerk shall
mail each voter a notice informing the voter of his or her current district
number, State Representative, and State Senator.
(5) A voter who has changed his or her name may indicate the change at the precinct
on election day by completing the form provided for this purpose by the State
Board of Elections. The form shall be returned by the precinct officer to the county
clerk who shall make the necessary change on the voter's registration record.
Section 34. KRS 27A.052 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Circuit Court clerk salary account is created as a trust and agency account in
the State Treasury to be administered by the Administrative Office of the Courts.
The account shall consist of the portion of fees directed to the account under
Section 11, and 18 of this Act, proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations,
or other moneys made available for the purposes of the account.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the account not expended
at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next
fiscal year.
(3)[ Any interest earnings of the account shall become a part of the account and shall
not lapse.
(4)] Moneys in the account shall be used for the purposes of hiring additional deputy
circuit clerks and providing salary adjustments to deputy circuit clerks and for no
other purpose[are hereby appropriated for these purposes].
Section 35. KRS 186.014 is amended to read as follows:
In any county, the:
(1) County clerk may maintain branch offices for the purpose of processing motor
vehicle titling and registration transactions; and
(2) Circuit clerk may maintain branch offices for the purpose of processing
applications for operator's licenses. instruction permits, and personal
Page 67 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1324
identification cards.
Section 36. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027.
Page 68 of 68
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed